Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-885.50
Continuing education and training; terms, defined.

As used in sections 81-885.49 to 81-885.54, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Commission shall mean the State Real Estate Commission;

(2) Licensee shall mean a natural person who is licensed by the commission as a real estate broker or salesperson; and

(3) Two-year period shall mean twenty-four months commencing on January 1 following either the date of licensing of the real estate broker or salesperson or March 8, 1985, whichever is later, and each succeeding twenty-four-month period.

Laws 1985, LB 101, § 6.